Utah statutes.
76-6-1407.   Violation by dealer -- Penalty -- Local regulation not less stringent.

(1) (a)  Any dealer who violates any of the provisions of this part is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) that occurs after the defendant has been convicted of a violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  This section does not impair the authority of a county or municipality in this state to license, tax, and regulate any junk dealer or metal dealer, except that local regulations may not be any less stringent than the provisions in this part.

(3)  This section does not impair the authority of a county or municipality to revoke or deny any business license or permit required by that county or municipality regulating the authority to sell, purchase, or possess metal, including the revocation or denial of a business license or permit based on a violation of this part.

(4)  This section does not prohibit the charging of a seller or dealer with any other criminal offense related to the obtaining, possession, or selling of stolen regulated metals.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

